California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(G) The California permits described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 8276.4 shall receive a maximum allocation of 175 trap tags.

(2) Participants in the program shall meet all of the following requirements:

(A) Unless a participant receives a waiver pursuant to paragraph (3), pay a biennial fee for each trap tag issued pursuant to this section to pay the pro rata share of costs of the program, including, but not limited to, informing permitholders of the program, collecting fees, acquiring
 and sending trap tags to permitholders, paying for a portion of enforcement costs, and monitoring the results of the program. The fee shall not exceed five dollars ($5) per trap, per two-year period. All of the trap tags allocated to each permit pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be purchased by the permitholder or the permit shall be void.

(B) Purchase a biennial crab trap limit permit of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per two-year period to pay for the department’s reasonable regulatory costs.

(C) Not lease a crab trap tag, and transfer a tag only as part of a transaction to purchase a California permitted crab vessel.

(D) A Dungeness crab trap that is fished shall contain a trap tag that is fastened to the main buoy, and an additional tag provided by the permitholder attached to the trap. The
 department shall mandate the information that is required to appear on both buoy and trap tags.

(3) The department shall issue a participant a waiver from the biennial fee for each trap tag described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) if the participant is unable to fish due to mandatory military service and the participant submits a request for a waiver to the department at the same time that the participant renews the permit issued pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2). A participant who receives a waiver pursuant to this paragraph shall not apply to the department to fish for Dungeness crab during the first year of the waiver, but may apply to fish for Dungeness crab during the second year of the waiver if the participant pays the full cost of the biennial fee for each trap tag. The department shall not limit the number of times a participant may request a waiver.

(4) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2), a vessel may transit state waters with Dungeness crab traps that are not tagged pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) if the traps contain either a valid Oregon or Washington trap tag, no crab species are onboard the vessel, and the traps are not deployed in state waters.

(5) The department shall annually provide an accounting of all costs associated with the crab trap limit program. The department shall use excess funds collected to reduce the cost of the crab trap limit permit fee or tag fee in subsequent years of the program.

(6) Permitholders may replace lost tags by application to the department and payment of a fee not to exceed the reasonable costs incurred by the department. The department may waive or reduce a fee in the case of catastrophic loss of tags.

(b) (1) In addition to criminal penalties authorized by law, a violation of the requirements of the program created pursuant to this section shall be subject to the following civil penalties:

(A) Conviction of a first offense shall result in a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per illegal trap or fraudulent tag.

(B) Conviction of a second offense shall result in a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per illegal trap or fraudulent tag, and the permit may be suspended for one year.

(C) Conviction of a third offense shall result in a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more
 than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per illegal trap or fraudulent tag, and the permit may be permanently revoked.

(2) The severity of a penalty within the ranges described in this subdivision shall be based on a determination whether the violation was willful or negligent and other factors.

(3) The portion of monetary judgments for noncompliance that are paid to the department shall be deposited in the Dungeness Crab Account created pursuant to subdivision (e).

(c) For the purposes of this section, a proposed recommendation that receives an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the voting members of the Dungeness crab task force may be transmitted to the director or the Legislature as a recommendation, shall be considered to be the consensus of the task force, and shall be considered to be evidence of consensus
 in the Dungeness crab industry. Any proposed recommendation that does not receive a vote sufficient to authorize transmittal to the director or Legislature as a recommendation shall be evidence of a lack of consensus by the Dungeness crab task force, and shall be considered to be evidence of a lack of consensus in the crab industry.

(d) The director may modify the program adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), if consistent with the requirements of this section, after consultation with the Dungeness crab task force or its representatives and after the task force has had 60 days or more to review the proposed modifications and recommend any proposed changes. The director may implement the modifications earlier than 60 days after it is sent to the Dungeness crab task force for review, if recommended by the task force.

(e) The Dungeness Crab Account is hereby established in the Fish
 and Game Preservation Fund and the fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in that account. The money in the account shall be used as follows:

(1) By the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for administering and enforcing the program.

(2) In each fiscal year through the 2029 fiscal year, upon appropriation by the Legislature, of the amount remaining in the account after an allocation pursuant to paragraph (1), the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), if available, shall be allocated to the council to support the administration and facilitation of the Dungeness crab task force.

(f) For purposes of meeting the necessary expenses of initial organization and operation of the program until fees may be collected, or other funding sources may be received, the department may
 borrow money as needed for these expenses from the council. The borrowed money shall be repaid within one year from the fees collected or other funding sources received. The council shall give high priority to providing funds or services to the department, in addition to loans, to assist in the development of the program, including, but not limited to, the costs of convening the Dungeness crab task force, environmental review, and the department’s costs of attending meetings with task force members.

(g) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department, the council, and the Dungeness crab task force work with the Pacific States Marine Fisheries Commission and the Tri-State Dungeness Crab Commission to resolve any issues pertaining to moving the fair start line south to the border of California and Mexico.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the
 resolution of issues pertaining to the fair start line shall be limited to assessing the positive and negative implications of including District 10 in the tri-state agreement, including working with the Tri-State Dungeness Crab Commission to amend Oregon and Washington laws to include District 10 in the regular season fair start clause, and discussion of providing different rules for District 10 with regard to preseason quality testing.

(h) For purposes of this section, “council” means the Ocean Protection Council established pursuant to Section 35600 of the Public Resources Code.

(i) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 155.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative April 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8277.

(a) The director may extend the Dungeness crab season in any district or part thereof.

(b) Before extending the Dungeness crab season, the director shall consider written findings of the department regarding the state of the Dungeness crab resource in the district, or part thereof, which consider, but are not limited to, population and maturity. The director may extend the season only if the written findings do not conclude that the extension will damage the Dungeness crab resource.

(c) The director shall not extend the Dungeness crab season past August 31 in a district, or part thereof, north of the southern boundary of Mendocino County or past July 31 in a district, or part thereof, south of Mendocino County. The director shall order closure of the season at any time during the extension period if the director determines that further fishing will damage the Dungeness crab resource.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 186.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8278.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, no Dungeness crab less than six and one-quarter (614) inches in breadth, and no female Dungeness crab, may be taken, possessed, bought, or sold, except that not more than 1 percent in number of any load or lot of Dungeness crabs may be less than six and one-quarter (614) inches in breadth but not less than five and three-quarters (534) inches in breadth.

(b) Dungeness crab shall be measured by the shortest distance through the body from edge of shell to edge of shell directly from front of points (lateral spines).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 187.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8279.

It is unlawful to sell any Dungeness crab taken in any of the following waters:

(a) The Eel River and its tributaries between the Pacific Ocean and the west line of Sec. 35, T. 3 N., R. 1 W., H. B. & M.

(b) The Pacific Ocean within a radius of one mile from the mouth of the Eel River.

(c) Humboldt Bay, including the entrance of that bay, and the Pacific Ocean within a radius of one mile from the extreme western point of the north jetty at the entrance of the bay and for a radius of one mile from the extreme western point of the south jetty at the entrance of the bay.

(d) Trinidad Bay, that bay being the body of water within the area inclosed by a line running southeasterly from the westernmost point of Trinidad Head to the mouth of Luftenholtz Creek.

(e) Bodega Lagoon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 874, Sec. 2.   Effective September 23, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

8279.1.

(a) A person shall not take, possess onboard, or land Dungeness crab for commercial purposes from a vessel in ocean waters for 30 days after the opening of those waters for the commercial Dungeness crab fishing season, if both of the following events have occurred:

(1) The opening of the season has been delayed in those waters.

(2) The same vessel was used to take, possess onboard, or land Dungeness crab for commercial purposes, from ocean waters outside of the delayed waters, before the opening of the delayed waters for the season.

(b) For purposes of this section, a delay in the opening of ocean waters for the commercial Dungeness crab
 fishing season has occurred in either of the following circumstances:

(1) The opening of those waters for the season has been delayed pursuant to Section 5523 or 8276.2 or the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 8276.1.

(2) The opening of those waters for the season has been delayed in Oregon or Washington due to the tri-state quality testing program or by a closure to prevent a risk to human health or a risk of marine life entanglement.

(c) A violation of this section does not constitute a misdemeanor. Pursuant to Section 7857, the commission shall revoke the Dungeness crab vessel permit that was issued for use on the vessel that was used in violation of this section.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2029, and,
 as of January 1, 2030, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 757, Sec. 6.   (SB 80)   Effective October 9, 2021.   Inoperative April 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8280.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the Dungeness crab fishery is important to the state because it provides a valuable food product, employment for those persons engaged in the fishery, and economic benefits to the coastal communities of the state.

(b) The Legislature further finds that, in order to protect the Dungeness crab fishery, it is necessary to limit the number of vessels participating in that fishery to take Dungeness crab and it may be necessary to limit the quantity and capacity of the fishing gear used on each vessel to take Dungeness crab.

(c) The Legislature further
 finds and declares that to limit the number of vessels in the Dungeness crab fishery, it is necessary to require that the owner of each vessel participating in the fishery obtain and possess a permit for that vessel and that the initial issuance of permits shall be limited to those persons owning vessels qualifying under Section 8280.1, as that section read on August 1, 2018, or any prior version of that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 663, Sec. 8.   (SB 1310)   Effective September 21, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

8280.1.

(a) A person shall not use a vessel to take, possess, or land Dungeness crab for commercial purposes using Dungeness crab traps authorized pursuant to Section 9011, unless the owner of that vessel has a Dungeness crab vessel permit for that vessel that has not been suspended or revoked.

(b) A person shall not be issued a new, original Dungeness crab vessel permit. A Dungeness crab vessel permit may be issued only pursuant to a renewal or transfer of an existing permit as provided in Section 8280.2 or 8280.3.

(c) A permit issued pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of
 this section, as this section read on August 1, 2018, or any prior version of that paragraph, shall become immediately null and void upon the death of the permittee.

(d) In addition to criminal penalties authorized by law, a person who fishes without a Dungeness crab vessel permit, or who uses a Dungeness crab vessel permit to fish illegally on another vessel other than the permitted one, shall be subject to a fine not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) and, at the discretion of the department, revocation of the person’s fishing license for a period not to exceed five years and revocation of the commercial boat registration license for a period not to exceed five
 years.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 663, Sec. 9.   (SB 1310)   Effective September 21, 2018.   Inoperative April 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8280.2.

(a) The owner of a Dungeness crab vessel, for purposes of this section, may include a person with a bona fide contract for the purchase of a vessel who otherwise meets all other qualifications for a Dungeness crab vessel permit. If a contract is found to be fraudulent or written or entered into for the purposes of circumventing qualification criteria for the issuance of a permit, the applicant shall be permanently ineligible for a Dungeness crab vessel permit.

(b) A Dungeness crab vessel permit shall be issued only to the person owning the vessel at the time of application for that permit. A person shall not be issued more than one permit for each vessel owned by that person and
 qualifying for a permit pursuant to this article.

(c) A Dungeness crab vessel permit shall be issued only to the owner of a vessel taking crab by traps. A permit shall not be issued to the owner of a vessel using trawl or other nets unless the owner of that vessel qualifies for a permit pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8280.1, as that section read on August 1, 2018, or any prior version of that paragraph. A trawl or other net vessel authorized under this code to take Dungeness crab incidental to the taking of fish in trawl or other nets shall not be required to possess a Dungeness crab vessel permit.

(d) Dungeness crab vessel permits shall not be combined or otherwise aggregated for the purpose of replacing smaller vessels in the fishery with a larger vessel, and a permit shall not be divided or otherwise separated for the purpose of replacing a vessel in the fishery with two or more smaller vessels.

(e) Applications for renewal of all Dungeness crab vessel permits shall be received by the department, or, if mailed, postmarked, by April 30 of each year. In order for a vessel to retain eligibility, a permit shall be obtained each year subsequent to the initial permit year and the vessel shall be registered pursuant to Section 7881. The vessel owner shall have a valid commercial fishing license issued to that person pursuant to Section 7852 that has not been suspended or revoked.
 Minimum landings of Dungeness crab shall not be required annually to be eligible for a Dungeness crab vessel permit.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 663, Sec. 10.   (SB 1310)   Effective September 21, 2018.   Inoperative April 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8280.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the term “length overall” means the horizontal distance between the forward-most and after-most points on the hull of a vessel. The length overall of a vessel does not include attachments fixed to the stern and bow.

(b) Notwithstanding Article 9 (commencing with Section 8100) of Chapter 1 and except as provided in this section, a Dungeness crab vessel permit shall not be transferred.

(c) (1) The owner of a vessel to whom a Dungeness crab vessel permit has been issued shall transfer the permit for the use of that vessel upon the sale of the vessel by the permitholder to the person purchasing
 the vessel, except that the permit shall not be transferred if the vessel is more than five feet longer in length overall, as determined by a licensed marine surveyor, than the baseline length on the permit. Thereafter, upon notice to the department, the person purchasing the vessel may use the vessel for the taking and landing of Dungeness crab for any and all of the unexpired portion of the permit year, and that person is eligible for a permit pursuant to this article for the use of that vessel in subsequent years. The person purchasing the vessel shall not transfer the permit for use of that vessel in the Dungeness crab fishery to another replacement vessel during the same permit year.

(2) A permit described in subdivision (c) of Section 8280.1 shall not be transferred pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) The owner of a vessel to whom the Dungeness crab vessel permit has been issued may transfer the permit to a replacement
 vessel of equivalent capacity, except as specified in this section. Thereafter, upon notice to the department and payment of the transfer fee specified in Section 8280.6, the replacement vessel may be used for the taking and landing of Dungeness crab for any and all of the unexpired portion of the permit year and that person is eligible for a permit pursuant to this article for the use of that replacement vessel in subsequent years.

(e) (1) The owner of a permitted vessel may transfer the permit to a vessel of greater capacity as follows:

(A) If the person the permit is to be transferred to purchased the vessel of greater capacity on or before November 15, 1995, the vessel of greater capacity may not be more than 10 feet longer in length
 overall than the baseline length on the permit.

(B) If the person the permit is to be transferred to purchased the vessel of greater capacity after November 15, 1995, the vessel of greater capacity may not be more than five feet longer in length overall than the baseline length on the permit.

(2) A permit described in subdivision (c) of Section 8280.1 shall not be transferred pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) (1) The department may authorize the owner of a permitted vessel to transfer the permit to a replacement vessel that was owned by the person the permit is to be transferred to on or before April 1, 1996, that does not fish with trawl nets that is greater than five feet longer in length overall than the
 baseline length on the permit, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) A vessel of a larger size is essential to the proposed
 permitholder for participation in another fishery other than a trawl net fishery.

(B) The owner of the permitted vessel held a permit on or before January 1, 1995, for the fishery for which a larger vessel is needed and has participated in that fishery.

(C) The permit for the vessel from which the permit is to be transferred qualified pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8280.1, as that section read on August 1, 2018, or any prior version of that paragraph.

(D) The vessel to which the permit is to be transferred does not exceed 20 feet longer in length overall than the baseline length on the permit and the vessel to which the permit is to be transferred does not exceed 60 feet in length
 overall.

(E) A permit was not previously transferred to the same replacement vessel.

(2) A permit described in subdivision (c) of Section 8280.1 shall not be transferred pursuant to this subdivision.

(g) A transfer of a permit to a larger vessel shall not be allowed more than one time. If a permit is transferred to a larger vessel, any Dungeness crab vessel permit for that permit year or any subsequent permit years for that larger vessel shall not be transferred to another larger vessel. The department shall not thereafter issue a Dungeness crab vessel permit for the use of the original vessel from which the permit was transferred, except that the original vessel may be used to take or land Dungeness crab after
 that transfer if its use is authorized pursuant to another Dungeness crab vessel permit subsequently transferred to that vessel pursuant to subdivision (d), (e), or (f).

(h) (1) Upon the written approval of the department, the owner of a vessel to whom the Dungeness crab vessel permit has been issued, which has California Dungeness crab landings made with trap gear documented on department electronic fish tickets and which has had California Dungeness crab landings amounting to not less than 5,000 pounds cumulative for the past two Dungeness crab seasons, may temporarily transfer the permit to a replacement vessel for which use in the Dungeness crab fishery is not permitted pursuant to this article that is of equivalent size and capacity of the originally permitted vessel, no greater than 10 feet longer in length overall than
 the vessel from which the permit is transferred, for a period of not more than six months during the current permit year if the vessel for which the permit was issued is seriously damaged, suffers major mechanical breakdown, or is lost or destroyed, as determined by the department, upon approval of the director. The owner of the vessel shall submit proof that the department may reasonably require to establish the existence of the conditions of this paragraph. Only the permittee at the time of the loss, theft, damage, breakdown, or destruction of the vessel may apply for the transfer of the vessel permit. Proof of loss or destruction shall be documented by submission of a copy of the report filed with the United States Coast Guard or any other law enforcement or fire agency that investigated the loss. In the case of mechanical breakdown, the request shall include an estimate of the costs to repair
 the vessel from a marine surveyor or boat repair yard. The department shall not issue a permit for a replacement vessel pursuant to this subdivision if the permitted vessel was
 reported lost, stolen, mechanically broken down, destroyed, or damaged for fraudulent purposes. Upon approval by the director, the owner of a vessel granted a six-month temporary transfer under this section may be granted an additional six-month extension of the temporary transfer.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 8280.2, in the event of loss or destruction of a vessel for which a Dungeness crab vessel permit was issued, or serious damage that renders the vessel inoperable, and upon written approval of the department, the owner of the vessel to whom the permit was issued may retain the permit and may transfer the permit to another vessel of equivalent size and capacity of the vessel that was lost or damaged during the period of two years after the loss or damage of the vessel for which the permit was
 originally issued. The owner of the lost or damaged vessel shall submit proof that the department may reasonably require to establish the loss or damage of the vessel. Only the permittee at the time of the loss, theft, damage, or destruction of the vessel may apply for the transfer of the vessel permit. Proof of loss or destruction shall be documented by submission of a copy of the report filed with the United States Coast Guard or any other law enforcement or fire agency that investigated the loss. In the case of mechanical breakdown, the request shall include an estimate of the costs to repair the vessel from a marine surveyor or boat repair yard. The department shall not issue a permit for a replacement vessel pursuant to this paragraph if the lost or damaged vessel was reported lost, stolen, destroyed, mechanically broken down, or damaged for fraudulent purposes. The department shall only transfer
 a permit pursuant to this paragraph if the lost or damaged vessel has a current permit and the owner of the lost or damaged vessel makes assurances in the application that any renewal of the permit that becomes due during the application processing period will be made. If the permit is not permanently transferred to another vessel within two years of the loss or damage, the permit shall become void by operation of law.

(i) Upon written approval of the department, the owner of a vessel to whom the Dungeness crab vessel permit has been issued may retain that permit upon the sale of that permitted vessel for the purpose of transferring the permit to another vessel if the requirements of this section are satisfied, including the payment of transfer fees. If the permit is not transferred to a new vessel within one year of the sale of the permitted
 vessel, the permit shall become void by operation of law.

(j) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 8280.1, in the event of the death or incapacity of a permitholder, the permit shall be transferred, upon application, to the heirs or assigns, or to the working partner, of the permitholder, together with the transfer of the vessel for which the permit was issued, and the new owner may continue to operate the vessel under the permit, renew the permit, or transfer the permit upon sale of the vessel pursuant to subdivision (b). The estate of the holder of a transferable Dungeness crab vessel permit may renew that permit as provided for in statute if needed to keep it valid. The estate of the decedent may transfer that permit pursuant to these regulations no later than two years from the date of death of the permitholder as listed on the
 death certificate.

(k) (1) For purposes of this section, the baseline length on a Dungeness crab vessel permit shall be equal to the length overall of the vessel for which the permit was originally issued, as originally documented on the permit, unless updated pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) (A) If, on or before March 31, 2020, the owner of a vessel to whom a Dungeness crab vessel permit has been issued submits to the department a survey reflecting a current length overall of the vessel that is greater than the length overall described in paragraph (1), the baseline length on the permit shall be equal to that current length overall.

(B) A survey submitted pursuant to subparagraph
 (A) shall be conducted by a licensed marine surveyor.

(l) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 876, Sec. 13.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative April 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8280.4.

(a) The commission may revoke the commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Section 7852 of any person owning a fishing vessel engaging in the taking or landing of Dungeness crab by traps for which that person has not obtained a Dungeness crab vessel permit, and the commission may revoke the registration, issued pursuant to Section 7881, for that vessel.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 663, Sec. 12.   (SB 1310)   Effective September 21, 2018.   Inoperative April 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8280.6.

(a) The department shall charge a fee for each Dungeness crab vessel permit of two hundred dollars ($200) for a resident of California and four hundred dollars ($400) for a nonresident of California, for the reasonable regulatory costs of the department.

(b) The department shall charge a nonrefundable fee of two hundred dollars ($200) for each transfer of a permit authorized pursuant to Section 8280.3, for the reasonable regulatory costs of the department.

(c) A vessel owner shall sign an application for transfer and certify that the information included in the application is true to the best of his or her
 information and belief.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 663, Sec. 14.   (SB 1310)   Effective September 21, 2018.   Inoperative April 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8280.7.

Notwithstanding Section 8280.1, the owner of a vessel, who has a Dungeness crab vessel permit for that vessel that has not been suspended or revoked, may contract for the use of a vessel that is registered pursuant to Section 7881 and for which a Dungeness crab vessel permit has not been issued for the purpose of assisting the crew of the permitted vessel in the deployment of Dungeness crab traps. An unpermitted vessel used for the purpose of assisting in the deployment of Dungeness crab traps pursuant to this section shall not have on board any equipment for the retrieval of Dungeness crab traps and shall not have on board at any time any Dungeness crab.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 186, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8280.9.

Dungeness crab vessel permits are valid only in state waters and in the Pacific Ocean in federal waters south of the border with Oregon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 297, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8281.

Crab meat and frozen crab taken during the open season may be possessed, transported, and sold at any time, subject to the regulations of the commission. The cost of inspection and marking, under the regulations of the commission, shall be paid by the owner or seller of the crab or crab meat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 91.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

8282.

(a) Subject to this article and Article 1 (commencing with Section 9000) of Chapter 4, and subject to the regulation of the commission authorized under subdivision (c), rock crab may be taken in traps in any waters of the state at any time, except in Districts 9, 19A, 19B, and 21 and those portions of District 20 lying on the north and east sides of Santa Catalina Island north of Southeast Rock. Rock crab (Cancer antennarius), red crab (Cancer productus), or yellow crab (Cancer anthonyi), which is less than 414 inches, measured in a straight line through the body, from edge of shell to edge of shell at the widest part, shall not be taken, possessed, bought, or sold.

(b) Any person taking rock crab shall carry a measuring device and shall measure any rock crab immediately upon removal from the trap. If the person determines that the rock crab is undersize, the person shall return it to the water immediately.

(c) Upon the recommendation of the director regarding rock crab fishery management measures, and following a public hearing on the matter, the commission may adopt regulations to manage the rock crab resource consistent with Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 610, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8283.

Crab traps may be set and baited 64 hours before the opening date of the Dungeness crab season. Crab traps may be set and baited in advance of that opening date if no other attempt is made to take or possess Dungeness crab.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 757, Sec. 8.   (SB 80)   Effective October 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8284.

(a) Subject to this article and Article 1 (commencing with Section 9000) of Chapter 4, crab traps, as described in Section 9011, may be used to take Dungeness crab for commercial purposes. Any fish may be taken incidentally in crab traps being used to take Dungeness crab.

(b) Except as provided in Section 9011 or subdivision (c), any other species taken incidentally in a crab trap being used to take rock crab, shall be immediately released back to the water.

(c) The following species may be taken incidentally in crab traps being used to take rock crab under a permit issued pursuant to Section 9001 in Districts 19 and 118.5:

(1) Kellet’s whelk.

(2) Octopus.

(3) Crabs other than of the genus Cancer, except as provided in Section 9011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 478, Sec. 1.   (AB 825)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8285.

(a) The director may open waters that are otherwise restricted for the commercial take of Dungeness crab or rock crab pursuant to Section 5523 during a time period when the State Department of Public Health authorizes the manufacture, sale, delivery, holding, or offering for sale of eviscerated Dungeness crab or rock crab pursuant to Article 15 (commencing with Section 111224) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, in accordance with the following requirements:

(1) The holder of a Dungeness crab vessel permit or rock crab permit shall submit to electronic monitoring of the vessel as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5523 while engaging
 in the take of Dungeness crab or rock crab to verify the locations where the Dungeness crab or rock crab is taken.

(2) A person shall not take, possess onboard, or land Dungeness crab or rock crab under an evisceration order on the same trip in which crab are taken, possessed onboard, or landed from waters outside those covered by the evisceration order.

(3) A person who takes Dungeness crab or rock crab is authorized to sell or provide the Dungeness crab or rock crab only to a processor licensed under Article 7 (commencing with Section 8030) of Chapter 1 and approved by the State Department of Public Health pursuant to Article 15 (commencing with Section 111224) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) When furnishing an electronic fish ticket pursuant to Section 8043, the processor shall identify on the
 electronic fish ticket that the Dungeness crab or rock crab received were taken from an area under an evisceration order.

(b) When evisceration procedures established pursuant to Article 15 (commencing with Section 111224) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code are no longer in effect, the director shall lift any restrictions imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) in a manner that promotes a fair and orderly fishery.

(c) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to actions taken pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 876, Sec. 14.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Clams and Other Mollusks [8340. - 8346.]

8340.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, in Districts 8, 9, and 17, clams may be taken between September 1st and April 30th, and in other districts clams may be taken at any time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8341.

All of the species of clams commonly known as littlenecks, chiones and hard-shell cockles, including thin-shelled littleneck, common littleneck, Japanese littleneck, rough-sided littleneck, smooth chione, wavy chione, and banded chione, may be taken at any time, except in the waters of Marin County, where they may be taken only between September 1st and March 31st.

No such clams measuring less than one and one-half inches in greatest diameter may be taken, possessed, transported, or sold.

The bag limit on such clams is 50 per day, in the aggregate. Not more than one daily bag limit of such clams may be possessed by any person during one day. 

Clams of the species herein designated, when legally taken outside the State and brought within the State pursuant to this code, may be possessed, transported, and sold without restrictions, except that all shipments of such clams into this State shall be accompanied by a bill of lading, or invoice, showing the species, total number or weight, and the origin of the clams.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 55.)
-------------------------------------------

8342.

In Districts 112, 8, and 9 the bag limit on Washington clams and gapers, sometimes known as bigneck clams, is 25 in the aggregate. In all other districts the bag limit is 10 Washington clams and 10 gapers.
